files/usr/share/postgresql/9.6/tsearch_data/russian.affix
SFX J Y 37
SFX J   Ш    С            Ш
SFX J   Ш    ЕН           Ш
SFX J   Ш    Е            Ш
SFX J   Ш    А            Ш
SFX J   П    Х            П
SFX J   П    Е            П
SFX J   П    Б            П
SFX J   К    С            К
SFX J   К    Й            ЙК
SFX J   К    ЕН           К
SFX J   К    Е            [^Й]К
SFX J   К    А            К
SFX J   Е    Х            [ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX J   Е    С            [^ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX J   Е    Й            ЙЕ
SFX J   Е    Б            [ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX J   Е    А            [^ГЦЫЭ]Е
SFX J   ЈЦ   ЕЦХ          ЈЦ
SFX J   ЈЦ   ЕЦЕ          ЈЦ
SFX J   ЈЦ   ЕЦБ          ЈЦ
SFX J   Ј    С            Ј
SFX J   Ј    Е            ШЈ
SFX J   Ј    А            Ј
SFX J   0    Х            [^ЕКПШ]
SFX J   0    Х            [^ЈЕКПЦШ]
SFX J   0    Х            [^Ј]Ц
SFX J   0    ПН           [^ГЕКПЦШЫЭЮ]
SFX J   0    ПН           [^ЈГЕКПЦШЫЭЮ]
SFX J   0    Н            П
SFX J   0    Н            Е
SFX J   0    Н            [ЈЕ]
SFX J   0    Е            [^ЕКПШ]
SFX J   0    Е            [^ЈЕКПЦШ]
SFX J   0    Е            [^Ј]Ц
SFX J   0    Б            [^ЕКПШ]
SFX J   0    Б            [^ЈЕКПЦШ]
SFX J   0    Б            [^Ј]Ц

SFX I Y 30
SFX I   ШОС  ЕО           ШОС
SFX I   ШЛБ  ЕЛ           ШЛБ
SFX I   С    Ш            [БЕЙПСХЩ]ОС
SFX I   С    К            [ЕЙХ]С
SFX I   С    Й            С
SFX I   С    ЕК           С
SFX I   С    ЕА           С
SFX I   С    Е            [^Й]С
SFX I   С    А            С
SFX I   ОС   ЕО           [^БЕЙКПСХШЩЪ]ОС
SFX I   ЛБ   ПЛ           [^АБГЕЙКПСХЦШЩЫЮ]ЛБ
SFX I   ЛБ   Л            [АБЕЙПСХЩ]ЛБ
SFX I   ЛБ   ЕЛ           [ГЦЫЮ]ЛБ
SFX I   КОС  ЕО           КОС
SFX I   КЛБ  ЕЛ           КЛБ
SFX I   Б    Щ            [^ЗИЛЦЫЭЮ]Б
SFX I   Б    Х            Б
SFX I   Б    ПК           [^ГЦЫЭЮ]Б
SFX I   Б    ПА           [^ГЦЫЭЮ]Б
SFX I   Б    Й            [ЗИЛЦЫЭЮ]Б
SFX I   Б    ЕК           [ГЫЭЮ]Б
SFX I   Б    ЕА           [ГЫЭЮ]Б
SFX I   Б    Е            Б
SFX I   Б    0            [^Л]Б
SFX I   0    НЙ           С
SFX I   0    НЙ           Б
SFX I   0    Н            С
SFX I   0    Н            Б
SFX I   0    И            С
SFX I   0    И            Б

SFX H Y 14
SFX H   С    Й            С
SFX H   С    ЕК           С
SFX H   С    ЕА           С
SFX H   С    Е            [^Й]С
SFX H   С    А            С
SFX H   К    А            [ЕП]К
SFX H   Б    Щ            [^ЗИЛЦЫЭЮ]Б
SFX H   Б    Х            Б
SFX H   Б    ПК           [^ГЦЫЭЮ]Б
SFX H   Б    ПА           [^ГЦЫЭЮ]Б
SFX H   Б    Й            [ЗИЛЦЫЭЮ]Б
SFX H   Б    ЕК           ЭБ
SFX H   Б    ЕА           ЭБ
SFX H   Б    Е            Б

SFX G Y 52
SFX G   ЩК   ПНХ          ЩК
SFX G   ЩК   ПН           ЩК
SFX G   ЩК   ПЗП          ЩК
SFX G   ШОС  ЕО           ШОС
SFX G   Ш    СНЙ          Ш
SFX G   Ш    СН           Ш
SFX G   Ш    СИ           Ш
SFX G   Ш    С            Ш
SFX G   Ш    Й            Ш
SFX G   Ш    ЕН           Ш
SFX G   Ш    ЕК           Ш
SFX G   Ш    Е            Ш
SFX G   Ш    А            Ш
SFX G   Ш    ЈН           Ш
SFX G   С    Ш            [БЕЙПХЩ]ОС
SFX G   С    К            [ЕЙХ]С
SFX G   С    Й            С
SFX G   С    ЕК           С
SFX G   С    ЕА           С
SFX G   С    Е            [^Й]С
SFX G   С    А            С
SFX G   С    ЈК           С
SFX G   С    ЈА           С
SFX G   ПЛ   ЛХ           ПЛ
SFX G   ПЛ   ЛПН          ПЛ
SFX G   ПЛ   ЛЕ           ПЛ
SFX G   ПЛ   ЛБ           ПЛ
SFX G   ПК   ЙН           ПК
SFX G   ОС   ЕО           [^БЕЙКПХШЩЪ]ОС
SFX G   КОС  ЕО           КОС
SFX G   К    НХ           ПК
SFX G   К    Н            ЩК
SFX G   К    Н            ПК
SFX G   К    Н            ЙК
SFX G   К    ЗП           ПК
SFX G   ЙК   ПНХ          ЙК
SFX G   ЙК   ПН           ЙК
SFX G   ЙК   ПЗП          ЙК
SFX G   ЕЛ   ЛХ           ЕЛ
SFX G   ЕЛ   ЛПН          ЕЛ
SFX G   ЕЛ   ЛЕ           ЕЛ
SFX G   ЕЛ   ЛБ           ЕЛ
SFX G   ЕГ   ГХ           ЕГ
SFX G   ЕГ   ГЕ           ЕГ
SFX G   ЕГ   ГБ           ЕГ
SFX G   0    ЩН           [^ГЕКЛПСЦШЫЭЮ]
SFX G   0    Х            [^ГЕКЛПСШ]
SFX G   0    НЙ           С
SFX G   0    Н            С
SFX G   0    И            С
SFX G   0    Е            [^ГЕКЛПСШ]
SFX G   0    Б            [^ГЕКЛПСШ]

SFX F Y 25
SFX F   Ш    Й            Ш
SFX F   ПОПЛ БФБНЙ        ПОПЛ
SFX F   ПОПЛ БФБН         ПОПЛ
SFX F   ПОПЛ БФБИ         ПОПЛ
SFX F   ПОПЛ БФБ          ПОПЛ
SFX F   ПОПЛ БФ           ПОПЛ
SFX F   ПЛ   ЛХ           ОПЛ
SFX F   ПЛ   ЛПН          ОПЛ
SFX F   ПЛ   ЛЕ           ОПЛ
SFX F   ПЛ   ЛБ           ОПЛ
SFX F   ЕОПЛ СФБНЙ        ЕОПЛ
SFX F   ЕОПЛ СФБН         ЕОПЛ
SFX F   ЕОПЛ СФБИ         ЕОПЛ
SFX F   ЕОПЛ СФБ          ЕОПЛ
SFX F   ЕОПЛ СФ           ЕОПЛ
SFX F   БС   ХА           БС
SFX F   БС   ПК           БС
SFX F   Б    Х            Б
SFX F   Б    ПК           Б
SFX F   ЈОПЛ СФБНЙ        ЈОПЛ
SFX F   ЈОПЛ СФБН         ЈОПЛ
SFX F   ЈОПЛ СФБИ         ЈОПЛ
SFX F   ЈОПЛ СФБ          ЈОПЛ
SFX F   ЈОПЛ СФ           ЈОПЛ
SFX F   0    А            Ш

SFX E Y 15
SFX E   ЩК   ЕК           ЩК
SFX E   ЩК   ЕЕ           ЩК
SFX E   Ш    С            Ш
SFX E   Ш    ЕН           Ш
SFX E   Ш    Е            Ш
SFX E   Ш    А            Ш
SFX E   Ш    ЈН           Ш
SFX E   С    Й            С
SFX E   С    ЕК           С
SFX E   С    ЕА           С
SFX E   С    Е            [^Й]С
SFX E   С    А            С
SFX E   С    ЈК           С
SFX E   С    ЈА           С
SFX E   Е    К            ЕЕ

SFX D Y 5
SFX D   ШУС  УС           ЙФШУС
SFX D   ФШУС ЕФУС         [БС]ФШУС
SFX D   ФШУС АФУС         [БС]ФШУС
SFX D   ЙФШУС СФУС         [^ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШУС
SFX D   ЙФШУС БФУС         [ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШУС

SFX B Y 25
SFX B   ЩФШУС ПКФЕУШ       ЩФШУС
SFX B   ЩФШУС ПКУС         ЩФШУС
SFX B   ЩФШ  ПКФЕ         ЩФШ
SFX B   ЩФШ  ПК           ЩФШ
SFX B   Ш    Е            ЙФШ
SFX B   ХФШУС ЙФЕУШ        ХФШУС
SFX B   ХФШУС ЙУШ          ХФШУС
SFX B   ХФШ  ЙФЕ          ХФШ
SFX B   ХФШ  Й            ХФШ
SFX B   ФШУС ФЕУШ         ЙФШУС
SFX B   ФШУС УШ           ЙФШУС
SFX B   ФШУС КФЕУШ        [БЕС]ФШУС
SFX B   ФШУС КУС          [БЕС]ФШУС
SFX B   ФШ   КФЕ          [БЕС]ФШ
SFX B   ФШ   К            [БЕС]ФШ
SFX B   УШ   ФЕУШ         ЙУШ
SFX B   УС   ФЕУШ         КУС
SFX B   УС   ФЕУШ         [^Ф]ШУС
SFX B   ПФШУС ЙФЕУШ        ПФШУС
SFX B   ПФШУС ЙУШ          ПФШУС
SFX B   ПФШ  ЙФЕ          ПФШ
SFX B   ПФШ  Й            ПФШ
SFX B   ЙФШ  Й            ЙФШ
SFX B   0    ФЕ           [ЙК]
SFX B   0    ФЕ           [^УФ]Ш
