files/usr/share/postgresql/9.6/tsearch_data/russian.dict
юБКЛПЧУЛЙК/G
чЕОЕУХЬМБ/H
чБЧЙМПЧ/G
чБФЙЛБО/J
фПТЦПЛ/G
уФЕРБ/H
уНЙФ/J
уБМБИПЧ/G
рХЫЛЙО/G
рТБЗБ/H
рЙФЕТ/J
пУПЛЙО/G
оБУФС/I
нПУЛЧБ/H
нПОФЕТТЕК/J
нЕДЧЕДЕЧ/G
мЙДПЮЛБ/H
мЕПОФШЕЧ/G
лХРТЙСО/J
лТЩМПЧ/G
лБУУЙПРЕС/H
йОДБХТ/J
иТХЭЈЧ/G
зТЙВПЕДПЧ/G
зТЕОМБОДЙС/H
еКУЛ/J
дПУФПЕЧУЛЙК/G
дБЫЕОШЛБ/H
вЕМПЧЕЦ/J
бТФЕНПЧОБ/I
бОФБТЛФЙЛБ/H
аЗПУМБЧЙС/H
ЮХЗБМШ/J
ЮЕТЧШ/G
ЮЕТОШ/F
ЮЕТОБЧЛБ/I
ЭЕЛБ/H
ЬФЙМВТПНЙД/J
ЬОБОФЙПНЕТЙС/H
ЬММЙОЛБ/I
ЬМЕЗЙЮОПУФШ/F
ЬМБУФЙЮОЩК/AES
ЬЛФПРМБЪНБ/H
ЫЧЕС/G
ЫМЙЖПЧЛБ/H
ЫЙТПФБ/I
ЫЕТМ/J
ЫЈТУФОПУФШ/F
ЪЧПОБТШ/G
ЪОБФОЩК/AES
ЪЕНМЕТПКЛБ/I
ЪБЮЙУМЙФШ/BLRW
ЪБЭЙЭЈООПУФШ/F
ЪБЫЙЖТПЧЛБ/H
ЪБЧПМБЛЙЧБФШУС/LPD
ЪБФЩМПЮЕЛ/G
ЪБФПЧБТЙЧБФШУС/BLMP
ЪБФЕНОЙФШУС/LD
ЪБУФХРМЕОЙЕ/J
ЪБТПЦДБФШУС/LPD
ЪБТЕЛБФШУС/BLMP
ЪБРТПЗТБННЙТПЧБООПУФШ/F
ЪБРБДОС/E
ЪБНХФЙФШУС/LRD
ЪБНЛОХФШ/BLRU
ЪБМЙЧЭЙГБ/I
ЪБЛБОЮЙЧБФШ/BLMP
ЪБЙУЛТЙФШУС/LD
ЪБЙОФЕТЕУПЧБООПУФШ/F
ЪБДЈТОХФШ/BLMR
ЪБВБЧОЩК/AES
ЧЪЩУЛЙЧБФШУС/LD
ЧЪДХЧБОЙЕ/J
ЧЩЮЙФЛБ/H
ЧЩЮЕУЩЧБФШ/BLMP
ЧЩЫЙЧБФШУС/LD
ЧЩУЧЕТМЙЧБФШУС/LD
ЧЩУЧБФЩЧБФШ/BLMP
ЧЩТПЦДБЕНПУФШ/F
ЧЩРПФТПЫЙФШ/BLRW
ЧЩРПМОЙФШУС/LD
ЧЩМПЧЙФШУС/LD
ЧЩЛТБДЙ/B
ЧЩЗПОСФШУС/LD
ЧЩЕЪДЛБ/I
ЧЩДХЧБОЙЕ/J
ЧЩВЙЧБФШ/BLMP
ЧФЕНСЫЙЧБФШУС/LD
ЧУЕМСФШУС/BLPU
ЧТБМШ/G
ЧРТБЧМСФШУС/LD
ЧПУФПТЦЕООПУФШ/F
ЧПУУПЪДБЧБФШ/BLPU
ЧПТПЦЕС/E
ЧПМШОЙГБ/H
ЧПДППУЧСЭЕОЙЕ/J
ЧОХЫБФШУС/LPD
ЧМБДЕМЙГБ/I
ЧМАВЮЙЧПУФШ/F
ЧЛПМБЮЙЧБФШ/BLMP
ЧЕФЕТПЮЕЛ/G
ЧЕУПНЩК/AES
ЧЕТУФБ/H
ЧЕМПЗПОЛБ/I
ЧДЕМБФШУС/LD
ЧЈТФЛПУФШ/F
ЦОЕС/G
ЦЙТПФПРМЕОЙЕ/J
ЦЕТЕВЈОПЮЕЛ/G
ЦЕОУФЧЕООЩК/AEX
ЦБТЙЭБ/H
ЦЈОЛБ/I
ХЭЕТВМЈООПУФШ/F
ХЧПДЙФШ/BLPW
ХФТПЙФШУС/LRD
ХУМБЦДБФШ/BLMP
ХТПДМЙЧЩК/AES
ХСЪЧМЕООПУФШ/F
ХРТПЮОСФШУС/LPD
ХМПНБФШ/BLMR
ХЛПТСФШУС/LD
ХИХДЫЕОЙЕ/J
ХЗТЕОПЛ/F
ХЗМЕДПВЩЮЕК/H
ХДБМСФШ/BLPU
ХВЕДЙФЕМШОЩК/AES
ФЩЮЙОЛБ/I
ФЧПТПЦПЛ/G
ФХТЕОПЛ/F
ФТЕВПЧБФЕМШОЩК/AES
ФТБНВПЧЭЙГБ/I
ФПТЦЕУФЧЕООПУФШ/F
ФПТНПЪЙФШУС/LPD
ФПТЛТЕФЙТПЧБОЙЕ/J
ФМС/G
ФЕУШНБ/H
ФЕУОЩК/AES
ФЕМЕФТБОУМСГЙС/I
ФБВХЙТПЧБООПУФШ/F
ФБВБЮПЛ/G
УЪЩЧБФШ/BLMP
УЧЩЛБОЙЕ/J
УЧЙФБ/I
УЧЕЦБЮПЛ/G
УЧБТМЙЧЩК/AES
УХЭЕУФЧЕООПУФШ/F
УХТЕРЙГЕК/H
УФТХС/G
УФТЕМСМЛБ/I
УФЕУОЈООПУФШ/F
УФБЧЙФШУС/LD
УФБТЙООЩК/AE
УФБОШ/B
УТЩФЙЕ/J
УРПТЭЙГБ/I
УПЧПЛХРОПУФШ/F
УПЧНЕУФЙФШ/BLRW
УПУЛПВМЙФШУС/LRD
УПРМС/G
УППВТБЪЙФЕМШОЩК/AES
УПНБФПНЕФТЙС/H
УПЕДЙОЙНПУФШ/F
УПВХФЩМШОЙГБ/I
УНХФЙФШ/BLRW
УНЕЫОЕЕ/E
УМПЧПЙЪНЕОЕОЙЕ/J
УМБОГЕЧБФПУФШ/F
УЛХЖШС/G
УЛТХФЙФШУС/LRD
УЛТХРХМЈЪОЩК/AES
УЛМПОЙФШ/BLRW
УЛМЕКЛБ/I
УЙЪБТШ/G
УЙОФЕФЙЮОПУФШ/F
УЗХЭЕОЛБ/H
УЕОФЙНЕОФБМШОЩК/AES
УЕОФЕОГЙС/I
УЕМЕЛФЙТПЧБОЙЕ/J
УЕЛТЕФБТШ/G
УВЩФПЮОПУФШ/F
УВПМЮЙЧБФШУС/LD
УБНВБ/H
УБДПЧОЙГБ/I
ТЩЛБФШ/BLMP
ТХЦШЈ/J
ТХИМСДШ/F
ТПЦПЮЕЛ/G
ТПДУФЧЕООЩК/AEX
ТЕЧПМАГЙС/I
ТЕЖТБЛГЙС/H
ТЕВЕОПЛ/F
ТЕБМШОЩК/AES
ТБЪЦЈЧЩЧБФШУС/LD
ТБЪТЩЧБФШ/BLMP
ТБЪПЮЕЛ/G
ТБЪОПМЙЛПУФШ/F
ТБЪНЕЭЕОЙЕ/J
ТБЪЗТХЦБФШ/BLMP
ТБЪЗТЕВБФШУС/LD
ТБЪЗБДЮЙГБ/I
ТБЪДТПВМЕООЩК/AES
ТБУЫБФЩЧБФШУС/LD
ТБУФСОХФПУФШ/F
ТБУФМЙФШ/BLRW
ТБУУМБЙЧБФШУС/LPD
ТБУРЕЮБФБФШ/BLMR
ТБУРБДБФШУС/LPRD
ТБОЙНЩК/AES
ТБИЙФ/J
ТБДЙПТБЪЧЕДЛБ/H
ТБВПФБ/I
СЮЕС/G
СУФТЕВЈОПЛ/F
СЗОЈОПЮЕЛ/G
РЩЫОЩК/AES
РХРЩТШ/G
РТПЮЕУЩЧБФШ/BLMP
РТПЮЕТЮЙЧБФШУС/LD
РТПЧПЛБФПТЫБ/I
РТПФПТЈООПУФШ/F
РТПУФПЛЧБЫЕК/H
РТПУМХЦЙФШ/BLRW
РТПТБЭЙЧБФШУС/LD
РТПТБВУФЧП/J
РТПЛПУЙФШ/BLRW
РТПЙЪЧПДЙФЕМШОЩК/ASE
РТПЗТЩЪБФШУС/LD
РТЙЮБУФЙФШУС/BLRW
РТЙЪЕНМЈООПУФШ/F
РТЙФХРЙФШУС/LRD
РТЙФПМПЛБ/I
РТЙУФТБЙЧБФШУС/BLMP
РТЙОГЙРЙБМШОЩК/AES
РТЙНЕОЙФШ/BLRW
РТЙЛТБЫЙЧБОЙЕ/J
РТЙЗМБЫБФШУС/LD
РТЙВЙТБФШУС/BLMP
РТЕДРПЮФЙФЕМШОЩК/AES
РТЕДПФЧТБЭБФШУС/LD
РТЕДНЕФОПУФШ/F
РСДЕОЙГБ/I
РПЮФБТШ/G
РПЫХТЫЙ/B
РПЪПТОЩК/AES
РПЦЙЧЕЕ/E
РПФСЗЙЧБФШУС/BLMP
РПФЕРМЕЕ/E
РПУФПК/J
РПУФЙМЛБ/H
РПУПЫПЛ/G
РПУЛХЮОЕЕ/E
РПТЕЫЙФШ/BLRW
РПТБУФПТПРОЕЕ/E
РПРМПФОЕЕ/E
РПНТБЮБФШУС/LD
РПМХУПФОС/I
РПМХЗПДПЛ/G
РПМПЧЮЕЕ/E
РПЛБЪБФЕМШОПУФШ/F
РПЙОФЕТЕУОЕЕ/E
РПИМПРПЮЙ/B
РПДФБЙЧБОЙЕ/J
РПДТПУФПЮЕЛ/G
РПДТБЪДЕМСФШУС/LPD
РПДПИОХФШ/BMR
РПДОПЦЛБ/I
РПВЕДОЕЕ/E
РМЙОЖБ/H
РЙЧОХЫЛБ/I
РЙУЛМС/G
РЙЛПФБЦ/J
РЕТЕЮЕТФЙФШ/BLRW
РЕТЕЧЙЧБФШУС/LPD
РЕТЕУЩМЛБ/I
РЕТЕТХВБФШУС/LD
РЕТЕНЕОСФШ/BLPRU
РЕТЕЛТЩЧБФШУС/LPD
РЕТЕЛПЮЕЧЩЧБОЙЕ/J
РЕТЕЙЪВЩФПЛ/G
РЕТЕЗТХОФПЧЛБ/H
РЕОЙУФЩК/AES
РЕОЙУФПУФШ/F
РБТФЙГЙС/I
РБДЙОБ/H
ПЮЕТЕФ/J
ПФЫЧЩТЙЧБФШУС/LD
ПФЫЙВБФШ/BLMP
ПФУЕЛБФШУС/LD
ПФТЕЫЈООЩК/AESX
ПФНЕТСФШ/BLPU
ПФЛТЙУФБММЙЪПЧЩЧБФШУС/LPD
ПФЗПЧПТЛБ/I
ПФЕОЕОЙЕ/J
ПУЧПВПЦДЈООПУФШ/F
ПУЧЕЭБФШУС/LPD
ПТПЫБФШ/BLMP
ПТЗБОЙЮОЩК/AEZ
ПРМБЧМСФШУС/LPD
ПОПНБФПМПЗЙС/H
ПЛТХЮЙЧБОЙЕ/J
ПЗМПВМС/I
ПДОПЖБЪОПУФШ/F
ПВЯЕНЙУФЩК/AES
ПВЪЩЧБФШ/BLMP
ПВЩУЛЙЧБФШУС/LD
ПВОБТХЦЙФШУС/LRD
ПВМЕЗЮБФШ/BLMP
ПВМБЗППВТБЦЙЧБОЙЕ/J
ПВЙДОЩК/AES
ОХДШ/F
ОПЪДТС/G
ОПТНБМЙЪБГЙС/I
ОПЗФПЕДБ/H
ОЕХЧЕТЕООЩК/AEX
ОЕХЦЙЧЮЙЧПУФШ/F
ОЕТЧПЪОПУФШ/F
ОЕРТЙМЙЮОЩК/AES
ОЕРПЧПТПФМЙЧПУФШ/F
ОЕРПОЙНБОЙЕ/J
ОЕОБЛБЪХЕНПУФШ/F
ОЕДПХЮЙФЩЧБФШУС/LD
ОЕДЕНПЛТБФЙЮОПУФШ/F
ОБФХТБМШОЩК/AES
ОБУФТПКЛБ/I
ОБУФБЧМСФШУС/LD
ОБУМБЦДБФШ/BLMP
ОБНБЗОЙЮЙЧБОЙЕ/J
ОБЛТЕОЙФШУС/LRD
ОБЗПОЛБ/H
ОБДТЩЧБФШ/BLMP
ОБДЈЦОЩК/AES
НЩУМЙФШУС/LD
НХМЕОПЛ/F
НСЗЛПФЕМЛБ/I
НПОПФПООЩК/AEX
НПДЕМЙЪН/J
НЙТТБ/I
НЙТПРПТСДПЛ/G
НЙЛТПЖПФПУЯЈНЛБ/H
НЕФПДЙЮОПУФШ/F
НЕДПЧБТОС/I
НБТПДЈТУФЧП/J
НБТЗБОЕГ/G
НБТБОФБ/H
НБКЛБ/I
МХОШ/G
МЙОЪБ/I
МЕФХЮЕУФШ/F
МЕФПУЮЙУМЕОЙЕ/J
МЕУПНЕМЙПТБГЙС/H
МЕДПЮЕЛ/G
МБЗХОБ/I
МАДОЩК/AES
ЛХУФБТШ/G
ЛТПЧМС/I
ЛТЙЛХЫБ/H
ЛТЕУФПЧОЙЛ/J
ЛПЪМЈОПЮЕЛ/G
ЛПТПЮЛБ/I
ЛПТБВМШ/G
ЛПОФТТЕЧПМАГЙПООПУФШ/F
ЛПОУЕТЧБФЙЧОЩК/AES
ЛПМЩИБФШУС/BLPD
ЛПММЕОИЙНБ/H
ЛОПРЙФ/J
ЛМСЛУБ/I
ЛМЕОПЮЕЛ/G
ЛБОПОБДБ/H
ЛБМНЩЮЛБ/I
ЛБМЕОДБТШ/G
ЙЪЪХВТЙЧБОЙЕ/J
ЙЪПФТПРОПУФШ/F
ЙЪНПЦДЕООЩК/AES
ЙУФСЪБФШУС/LPD
ЙОДПМПЗЙС/H
ЙЗДБОЙФ/J
ИТСЭЕЧБФПУФШ/F
ИТЙУФЙБОЛБ/I
ИТБВТЩК/AES
ИТАЛБФШ/BLMP
ЗХБТБОБ/H
ЗПУУЕЛТЕФБТШ/G
ЗПТЙГЧЕФ/J
ЗМХВПЛПНЩУМЕООЩК/AEX
ЗЙФБТБ/I
ЗЙРЕТФПОЙС/H
ЗЕФЕТПЪЙЗПФОПУФШ/F
ЗБЪПЛПОДЕОУБФ/J
ЗБЪЙЖЙЛБГЙС/H
ЖЙМПЛБТФЙС/H
ЖЕТЪШ/G
ЖБХОБ/I
ЖБОФПНБУ/J
ДТЕВЕДЕОШ/F
ДПОБЫЙЧБФШ/BLMP
ДПЕОЙЕ/J
ДПВТПЦЕМБФЕМШОЩК/AES
ДЙЪЕОФЕТЙС/H
ДЙУЖХОЛГЙС/I
ДЙЛБТШ/G
ДЕООЙГЕК/H
ГЧЕФПТБЪМЙЮЕОЙЕ/J
ГЕОЪХТОПУФШ/F
ВХТЙФШУС/LD
ВХЛУПЧЛБ/H
ВХЛПМШЛБ/I
ВТАЪЗМЙЧЩК/AES
ВПНВБТДЙТПЧБОЙЕ/J
ВЕЪЦБМПУФОЩК/AES
ВЕЪХУРЕЫОПУФШ/F
ВЕУРХФЙГЕК/H
ВЕУРПНПЭОЩК/AES
ВЕУРЙУШНЕООПУФШ/F
ВЕУЕОПЛ/G
ВЕЗПОЙС/I
ВБУЛЕФВПМ/J
БЧФПЛПММЙНБГЙС/H
БРПУФПМШУФЧП/J
БОФТПРПУПЖЙС/H
БОФЙФЕЪБ/I
БЛБТПМПЗЙС/H
БЛБДЕНЙЪН/J
БЗЙФБГЙПООПУФШ/F
